Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-1203
City, county, and state agency; report; contents.

On or before March 1, 2028, and on or before March 1 of each year thereafter, each city, county, and state agency shall submit a report to the division containing the following information:

(1) The name and address of each individual or entity that was awarded a service contract during the most recently completed fiscal year and the type of service involved in each such contract;

(2) The total dollar value of service contracts awarded during the most recently completed fiscal year, including an overall total and a breakdown by zip code; and

(3) A description of any efforts made by the city, county, or state agency to increase the number of service contracts awarded to individuals and entities located within zip codes with the lowest amounts of service contract awards.

Laws 2026, LB1135, § 3.
July 18, 2026